Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-8,198.01
Coordinating professional; designation; duties.

(1) Landscape architecture design projects involving more than one design professional shall have a designated coordinating professional for the entire project. The coordinating professional may, but need not, provide professional services on the project. The coordinating professional shall apply his or her seal in accordance with the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act or the Professional Landscape Architects Act to the cover sheet of all documents and denote the seal as that of the coordinating professional.

(2) The coordinating professional shall be responsible for reviewing and coordinating technical documents prepared by any other design professional for compatibility with the design of the project.

Laws 2020, LB30, § 19.

Engineers and Architects Regulation Act, see section 81-3401.